Utah statutes.
58-63-304.   Exemptions from licensure.

(1)  In addition to the exemptions from licensure in Section 58-1-307, the following individuals may engage in acts regulated under this chapter without being licensed under this chapter:

(a)  a peace officer employed by or licensed as a contract security company; and

(b)  a person employed by a contract security company for the sole purpose of operating or staffing security apparatus, including a magnetometer, magnetometer wand, x-ray viewing device, or other device approved by rule of the division.

(2)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the division may make rules approving security apparatus under Subsection (1)(b).

